Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,123
Prohibited sale; violation; penalty.

No person, other than the owner of the livestock, shall sell or offer for sale or trade or otherwise dispose of any livestock unless the person so offering has the bill of sale, a power of attorney from the owner of such livestock authorizing such sale, or other satisfactory evidence of ownership. A violation of this section is a Class III felony.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 54.

Bill of sale of cattle must state the statutory details required. Coomes v. Drinkwalter, 181 Neb. 450, 149 N.W.2d 60 (1967).

Trade of livestock is not limited by this section. Bendfeldt v. Lewis, 149 Neb. 107, 30 N.W.2d 293 (1948).